Vermont, session 2025-2026, H411.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Extradition * * *
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4955 is amended to read:
§ 4955. COMMITMENT TO AWAIT EXTRADITION; BAIL
If upon examination it appears that the person held is the person charged
with having committed the crime alleged and that the person probably
committed the crime, and, except in cases arising under section 4946 of this
title, that the person has fled from justice, the judge or magistrate shall commit
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 3 of 86
the person to jail by a warrant, reciting the accusation, for such a time, not
exceeding 30 120 days, to be specified in the warrant as will enable the arrest
of the accused to be made under a warrant of the Governor on a requisition of
the executive authority of the state having jurisdiction of the offense, unless the
accused give bail as provided in section 4956 of this title, or until the person
shall be legally discharged. On request of the state, the hearing may be
continued for up to three working business days, only for the purpose of
determining whether the person probably committed the crime. Findings under
this section may be based upon hearsay evidence or upon copies of affidavits,
whether certified or not, made outside this State. It shall be sufficient for a
finding that a person probably committed the crime that there is a current grand
jury indictment from another state.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 4967 is amended to read:
§ 4967. WRITTEN WAIVER OF EXTRADITION PROCEEDINGS
(a) Any person arrested in this State charged with having committed any
crime in another state or alleged to have escaped from confinement, or broken
the terms of his or her bail, probation, or parole may waive the issuance and
service of the warrant provided for in sections 4947 and 4948 of this title and
all other procedure incidental to extradition proceedings, by executing or
subscribing in the presence of a judge of any court of record within this State a
writing that states that he or she the person consents to return to the demanding
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 4 of 86
state; provided however, before such the waiver shall be is executed or
subscribed by such the person it shall be the duty of such, the judge to shall
inform such the person of his or her the rights right to the issuance and service
of a warrant of extradition and to obtain a writ of habeas corpus as provided for
in section 4950 of this title.
(b) If and when such consent has been duly executed, it shall forthwith be
forwarded to the office of the Governor of this State and filed therein. The
judge shall direct the officer having such person in custody to deliver forthwith
such person to the duly accredited agent or agents of the demanding state, and
shall deliver or cause to be delivered to such agent or agents a copy of such
consent; provided however, that nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit
the rights of the accused person to return voluntarily and without formality to
the demanding state, nor shall this waiver procedure be deemed to be an
exclusive procedure or to limit the powers, rights or duties of the officers of the
demanding state or of this State.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a law enforcement agency
in this State holding a person who is alleged to have broken the terms of the
person’s probation, parole, bail, or any other release in the demanding state
shall immediately deliver that person to the duly authorized agent of the
demanding state without the requirement of a Governor’s warrant if all of the
following apply:
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 5 of 86
(1) The person has signed a prior waiver of extradition as a term of the
person’s current probation, parole, bail, or other release in the demanding state.
(2) The law enforcement agency holding the person has received an
authenticated copy of the prior waiver of extradition signed by the person and
photographs or fingerprints or other evidence properly identifying the person
as the person who signed the waiver.
(3) Except as the State’s Attorney shall otherwise determine in the
interest of justice, all open criminal charges in this State have been disposed of
through trial and sentencing.
Sec. 3. 13 V.S.A. § 5043 is amended to read:
§ 5043. HEARING, COMMITMENT, DISCHARGE
(a) If an arrest is made in this State by an officer of another state in
accordance with the provisions of section 5042 of this title, he or she shall the
officer, without unnecessary delay, shall take the person arrested before a
Superior judge of the unit in which the arrest was made, who shall conduct a
hearing for the purpose of determining the lawfulness of the arrest.
(b) If the judge determines that the arrest was lawful, he or she the judge
shall commit the person arrested to await for a reasonable time the issuance
within 120 days of an extradition warrant by the Governor of this State or
admit such person to bail pending the issuance of such warrant. The judge
shall consider the issuance of a judicial warrant for the arrest of the person who
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 6 of 86
has fled justice to Vermont from another state when determining the risk of
flight from prosecution.
(c) If the judge determines that the arrest was unlawful, he or she the judge
shall discharge the person arrested.
* * * Sentencing * * *
Sec. 4. 13 V.S.A. § 5411d is amended to read:
§ 5411d. DESIGNATION OF NONCOMPLIANT HIGH-RISK SEX
OFFENDER
* * *
(g)(1) A noncompliant high-risk sex offender who knowingly fails to
comply with any of the Registry requirements under this section shall be
imprisoned for not less than five years and a maximum term of life and, in
addition, may be fined not more than $50,000.00. A sentence may be
suspended in whole or in part, or the The person may be eligible for parole or
release on conditional reentry or furlough, provided the person is subject to
intensive supervision by the Department of Corrections.
(2) In a criminal proceeding for violating any of the Registry
requirements under this section, a defendant shall be prohibited from
challenging his or her the defendant’s status as a noncompliant high-risk sex
offender.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 7 of 86
Sec. 5. 13 V.S.A. § 7031 is amended to read:
§ 7031. FORM OF SENTENCES; MAXIMUM AND MINIMUM TERMS
(a) When a respondent is sentenced to any term of imprisonment, other
than for life, the court imposing the sentence shall not fix the term of
imprisonment, unless the term is definitely fixed by statute, but shall establish
a maximum and may establish a minimum term for which the respondent may
be held in imprisonment. The maximum term shall not be more than the
longest term fixed by law for the offense of which the respondent is convicted,
and the minimum term shall be not less than the shortest term fixed by law for
the offense. If the court suspends a portion of the sentence, the unsuspended
portion of the sentence shall be the minimum term of sentence solely for the
purpose of any reductions of term for good behavior as set forth in 28 V.S.A.
§ 811. A sentence shall not be considered fixed as long as the maximum and
minimum terms are not identical.
(b) The sentence of imprisonment of any person convicted of an offense
shall commence to run from the date on which the person is received at the
correctional facility for service of the sentence. The court shall give the person
credit toward service of his or her the person’s sentence for any days spent in
custody as follows:
(1) The period of credit for concurrent and consecutive sentences shall
include all days served from the date of arraignment or the date of the earliest
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 8 of 86
detention for the offense, whichever occurs first, and end on the date of the
sentencing. Only a single credit shall be awarded in cases of consecutive
sentences, and no credit for one period of time shall be applied to a later
period.
(2) In sentencing a violation of probation, the court shall give the person
credit for any days spent in custody from the time the violation is filed or the
person is detained on the violation, whichever occurs first, until the violation is
sentenced. In a case in which probation is revoked and the person is ordered to
serve the underlying sentence, the person shall receive credit for all time
previously served in connection with the offense.
(3) A defendant who has received pre-adjudication treatment in a
residential setting for a substance use disorder after the charge has been filed
shall earn a reduction of one day in the offender’s minimum and maximum
sentence for each day that the offender receives the inpatient treatment.
(c) If any such person is committed to a jail or other place of detention to
await transportation to the place at which his or her the person’s sentence is to
be served, his or her the sentence shall commence to run from the date on
which he or she the person is received at the jail or the place of detention.
(d) A person who receives a zero minimum sentence for a conviction of a
nonviolent misdemeanor or nonviolent felony as defined in 28 V.S.A. § 301
shall report to probation and parole as directed by the court and begin to serve
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 9 of 86
the sentence in the community immediately, unless the person is serving a
prior sentence at the time.
(e) For a conviction of a listed crime pursuant to 13 V.S.A. § 5301(7), a
court shall not order a sentence that is suspended, deferred, or served as a
supervised sentence if the person has a prior conviction for escape pursuant to
13 V.S.A. § 1501 or a felony listed crime unless the court makes findings on
the record that there are compelling reasons why such a sentence will serve the
interests of justice and protect the public.
(f) A court shall not suspend, in whole or in part, a sentence for a person
who has previously been found to have violated probation, been
unsatisfactorily discharged from probation, or had furlough revoked unless the
court makes findings on the record that there are compelling reasons why such
a sentence will serve the interests of justice and protect the public.
Sec. 6. 13 V.S.A. § 7042 is amended to read:
§ 7042. SENTENCE REVIEW
(a) Any court imposing a sentence under the authority of this title, within
90 days of the imposition of that sentence, or within 90 days after entry of any
order or judgment of the Supreme Court upholding a judgment of conviction,
may upon its own initiative or motion of the defendant, reduce the sentence.
(b) A State’s Attorney or the Attorney General, within seven business days
of the imposition of a sentence, may file with the sentencing judge a motion to
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 10 of 86
increase, reduce, or otherwise modify the sentence. This motion shall set forth
reasons why the sentence should be altered. After hearing, the court may
confirm, increase, reduce, or otherwise modify the sentence.
(c) After a motion is filed under subsection (b) of this section, a
defendant’s time for filing an appeal under 12 V.S.A. § 2383 shall commence
to run upon entry of a final order under subsection (b).
(d) A court shall not reduce the sentence for a conviction of a listed crime
as provided by 13 V.S.A. § 5301(7) if the defendant has a prior conviction for
a listed crime.
* * * Bail * * *
Sec. 7. BAIL REVOCATION; INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly that its bail revocation statute is
consistent with State v. Sauve, 159 Vt. 566 (1993); State v. Gates, 2016 VT 36;
and their progeny so that repeated failures to appear in court, repeated
violations of conditions of release, and other violations of court orders
constitute a compelling State interest that falls within the statutory definition of
“disrupts the prosecution.”
Sec. 8. 13 V.S.A. § 7575 is amended to read:
§ 7575. REVOCATION OF THE RIGHT TO BAIL
(a) The prosecutor, or the court on its own motion, may move to revoke
bail pursuant to this section.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 11 of 86
(b) The right to bail may be revoked entirely if the judicial officer finds that
the accused has:
(1) intimidated or harassed a victim, potential witness, juror, or judicial
officer in violation of a condition of release; or
(2) repeatedly violated conditions of release in a manner that impedes
disrupts the prosecution of the accused; or
(3) violated a condition or conditions of release that constitute a threat to
the integrity of the judicial system; or
(4) without just cause, failed to appear at a specified time and place
ordered by a judicial officer; or
(5) in violation of a condition of release, been charged with a felony or a
crime against a person or an offense similar to the underlying charge, for
which, after hearing, probable cause is found.
(c) If the court revokes bail, it shall order the defendant’s immediate arrest
without a warrant if the person is within the State and declare any bond
pledged by the defendant forfeited.
(d)(1) If a defendant’s bail is revoked, the court shall set the defendant’s
case for trial not more than 60 days from the date of revocation.
(2) If the trial is not commenced within 60 days after revocation and the
delay is not attributable to the defense, the court shall immediately schedule a
bail hearing for the defendant.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 12 of 86
Sec. 9. 13 V.S.A. § 7576 is amended to read:
§ 7576. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(4) “Disrupt the prosecution” means, in addition to any other meaning
recognized by law, committing a criminal offense or violating a condition of
release by a defendant who has been released pending trial for another offense
and demonstrates that there is no condition or combination of conditions of
release that will reasonably mitigate the defendant’s risk of flight from
prosecution, reasonably mitigate the defendant’s risk to public safety, or
reasonably ensure the defendant’s compliance with court orders and
appearances.
(5) “Needs screening” means a preliminary systematic procedure to
evaluate the likelihood that an individual has a substance abuse or a mental
health condition.
(5)(6) “Risk assessment” means a pretrial assessment that is designed to
be predictive of a person’s failure to appear in court and risk of violating
pretrial conditions of release with a new alleged offense.
(6)(7) “Secured appearance bond” means a written agreement which that
allows a person charged with a criminal offense to be released if:
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 13 of 86
(A) the person pledges to pay the court a specified amount in the
event that the person fails to appear at a court proceeding; and
(B) a portion of the bond is paid to the court prior to release.
(7)(8) “Surety” means:
(A) a person who agrees to be responsible for guaranteeing the
appearance in court of a person charged with a criminal offense; or
(B) a person who agrees to be responsible for guaranteeing that
another person complies with the conditions of a peace bond under section
7573 of this title.
(8)(9) “Surety bond” means a written agreement, in a form established
by the Court Administrator, under which a surety guarantees the appearance in
court of a person charged with a criminal offense, and pledges to pay the court
a specified amount if the person fails to appear.
(9)(10) “Flight from prosecution” means any action or behavior
undertaken by a person charged with a criminal offense to avoid court
proceedings.
* * * Criminal History Records * * *
Sec. 10. 13 V.S.A. chapter 230 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 230. EXPUNGEMENT AND SEALING OF CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORDS
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 14 of 86
§ 7601. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Court” means the Criminal Division of the Superior Court.
(2) “Criminal history record” means all information documenting an
individual’s contact with the criminal justice system, including data regarding
identification, arrest or citation, arraignment, judicial disposition, custody, and
supervision.
(3) “Predicate offense” means a criminal offense that can be used to
enhance a sentence levied for a later conviction and includes operating a
vehicle under the influence of alcohol or other substance in violation of
23 V.S.A. § 1201, domestic assault in violation of section 1042 of this title,
and stalking in violation of section 1062 of this title. “Predicate offense” shall
not include misdemeanor possession of cannabis, a disorderly conduct offense
under section 1026 of this title, or possession of a controlled substance in
violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4230(a), 4231(a), 4232(a), 4233(a), 4234(a), 4234a(a),
4234b(a), 4235(b), or 4235a(a). [Repealed.]
(4) “Qualifying crime” means:
(A) a misdemeanor offense that is not:
(i) a listed crime as defined in subdivision 5301(7) of this title;
(ii) an offense involving sexual exploitation of children in
violation of chapter 64 of this title;
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 15 of 86
(iii) an offense involving violation of a protection order in
violation of section 1030 of this title;
(iv) prostitution as defined in section 2632 of this title, or
prohibited conduct under section 2601a of this title; or
(v) a predicate offense;
(B) a violation of subsection 3701(a) of this title related to criminal
mischief;
(C) a violation of section 2501 of this title related to grand larceny;
(D) a violation of section 1201 of this title related to burglary,
excluding any burglary into an occupied dwelling, as defined in subdivision
1201(b)(2) of this title;
(E) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4223 related to fraud or deceit;
(F) a violation of section 1802 of this title related to uttering a forged
or counterfeited instrument;
(G) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4230(a) related to possession and
cultivation of cannabis;
(H) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4231(a) related to possession of
cocaine;
(I) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4232(a) related to possession of LSD;
(J) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4233(a) related to possession of heroin;
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 16 of 86
(K) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4234(a) related to possession of
depressant, stimulant, and narcotic drugs;
(L) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4234a(a) related to possession of
methamphetamine;
(M) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4234b(a) related to possession of
ephedrine and pseudoephedrine;
(N) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4235(b) related to possession of
hallucinogenic drugs;
(O) a violation of 18 V.S.A. § 4235a(a) related to possession of
ecstasy; or
(P) any offense for which a person has been granted an unconditional
pardon from the Governor all misdemeanor offenses except:
(i) a listed crime as defined in subdivision 5301(7) of this title;
(ii) a violation of chapter 64 of this title related to sexual
exploitation of children;
(iii) a violation of section 1030 of this title related to a violation of
an abuse prevention order, an order against stalking or sexual assault, or a
protective order concerning contact with a child;
(iv) a violation of chapter 28 of this title related to abuse, neglect,
and exploitation of a vulnerable adult;
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 17 of 86
(v) a violation of subsection 2605(b) or (c) of this title related to
voyeurism;
(vi) a violation of subdivisions 352(1)–(10) of this title related to
cruelty to animals;
(vii) a violation of section 5409 of this title related to failure to
comply with sex offender registry requirements;
(viii) a violation of section 1455 of this title related to hate
motivated crimes;
(ix) a violation of subsection 1304(a) of this title related to cruelty
to a child;
(x) a violation of section 1305 of this title related to cruelty by
person having custody of another;
(xi) a violation of section 1306 of this title related to mistreatment
of persons with impaired cognitive function;
(xii) a violation of section 3151 of this title related to female
genital mutilation;
(xiii) a violation of subsection 3258(b) of this title related to
sexual exploitation of a minor;
(xiv) a violation of subdivision 4058(b)(1) of this title related to
violation of an extreme risk protection order; and
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 18 of 86
(xv) an offense committed in a motor vehicle as defined in
23 V.S.A. § 4 by a person who is the holder of a commercial driver’s license or
commercial driver’s permit pursuant to 23 V.S.A. chapter 39; and
(B) the following felonies:
(i) a violation of section 1201 of this title related to burglary,
excluding any burglary into an occupied dwelling, unless the person was
25 years of age or younger at the time of the offense and did not carry a
dangerous or deadly weapon during the commission of the offense;
(ii) designated felony property offenses as defined in subdivision
(5) of this section;
(iii) offenses relating to possessing, cultivating, selling,
dispensing, or transporting regulated drugs, including violations of 18 V.S.A.
§ 4230(a) and (b), 4231(a) and (b), 4232(a) and (b), 4233(a) and (b), 4233a(a),
4234(a) and (b), 4234a(a) and (b), 4234b(a) and (b), 4235(b) and (c), or
4235a(a) and (b); and
(iv) any offense for which a person has been granted an
unconditional pardon from the Governor.
(5) “Designated felony property offense” means:
(A) a felony violation of 9 V.S.A. § 4043 related to fraudulent use of
a credit card;
(B) section 1801 of this title related to forgery and counterfeiting;
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 19 of 86
(C) section 1802 of this title related to uttering a forged or
counterfeited instrument;
(D) section 1804 of this title related to counterfeiting paper money;
(E) section 1816 of this title related to possession or use of credit
card skimming devices;
(F) section 2001 of this title related to false personation;
(G) section 2002 of this title related to false pretenses or tokens;
(H) section 2029 of this title related to home improvement fraud;
(I) section 2030 of this title related to identity theft;
(J) section 2501 of this title related to grand larceny;
(K) section 2531 of this title related to embezzlement;
(L) section 2532 of this title related to embezzlement by officers or
servants of an incorporated bank;
(M) section 2533 of this title related to embezzlement by a receiver
or trustee;
(N) section 2561 of this title related to receiving stolen property;
(O) section 2575 of this title related to retail theft;
(P) section 2582 of this title related to theft of services;
(Q) section 2591 of this title related to theft of rented property;
(R) section 2592 of this title related to failure to return a rented or
leased motor vehicle;
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 20 of 86
(S) section 3016 of this title related to false claims;
(T) section 3701 of this title related to unlawful mischief;
(U) section 3705 of this title related to unlawful trespass;
(V) section 3733 of this title related to mills, dams, or bridges;
(W) section 3761 of this title related to unauthorized removal of
human remains;
(X) section 3766 of this title related to grave markers and ornaments;
(Y) chapter 87 of this title related to computer crimes; and
(Z) 18 V.S.A. § 4223 related to fraud or deceit in obtaining a
regulated drug.
§ 7602. EXPUNGEMENT AND SEALING OF RECORD,
POSTCONVICTION; PROCEDURE
(a)(1) A person may file a petition with the court requesting expungement
or sealing of the criminal history record related to the conviction if:
(A) the person was convicted of a qualifying crime or qualifying
crimes arising out of the same incident or occurrence;
(B) the person was convicted of an offense for which the underlying
conduct is no longer prohibited by law or designated as a criminal offense;
(C) pursuant to the conditions set forth in subsection (g) of this
section, the person was convicted of a violation of 23 V.S.A. § 1201(a) or
§ 1091 related to operating under the influence of alcohol or other substance,
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 21 of 86
excluding a violation of those sections resulting in serious bodily injury or
death to any person other than the operator, or related to operating a school bus
with a blood alcohol concentration of 0.02 or more or operating a commercial
vehicle with a blood alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more; or
(D) pursuant to the conditions set forth in subsection (h) of this
section, the person was convicted under 1201(c)(3)(A) of a violation of
subdivision 1201(a) of this title related to burglary when the person was
25 years of age or younger, and the person did not carry a dangerous or deadly
weapon during commission of the offense.
(2) The State’s Attorney or Attorney General shall be the respondent in
the matter.
(3) The court shall grant the petition without hearing if the petitioner
and the respondent stipulate to the granting of the petition. The respondent
shall file the stipulation with the court, and the court shall issue the petitioner
an order of expungement and provide notice of the order in accordance with
this section.
(4) This section shall not apply to an individual licensed as a
commercial driver pursuant to 23 V.S.A. chapter 39 seeking to seal or expunge
a record of a conviction for a felony offense committed in a motor vehicle as
defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 22 of 86
(b)(1) The court shall grant the petition and order that the criminal history
record be expunged pursuant to section 7606 of this title if the following
conditions are met:
(A) At least five years have elapsed since the date on which the
person successfully completed the terms and conditions of the sentence for the
conviction, or if the person has successfully completed the terms and
conditions of an indeterminate term of probation that commenced at least five
years previously.
(B) The person has not been convicted of a crime arising out of a new
incident or occurrence since the person was convicted for the qualifying crime.
(C) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court have been
paid in full, provided that payment of surcharges shall not be required if the
surcharges have been waived by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
(D) The court finds that expungement of the criminal history record
serves the interests of justice.
(2) The court shall grant the petition and order that all or part of the
criminal history record be sealed pursuant to section 7607 of this title if the
conditions of subdivisions (1)(A), (B), and (C) of this subsection are met and
the court finds that:
(A) sealing the criminal history record better serves the interests of
justice than expungement; and
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 23 of 86
(B) the person committed the qualifying crime after reaching 19
years of age.
(c)(1) The court shall grant the petition and order that the criminal history
record be expunged pursuant to section 7606 of this title if the following
conditions are met:
(A) At least 10 years have elapsed since the date on which the person
successfully completed the terms and conditions of the sentence for the
conviction.
(B) The person has not been convicted of a felony arising out of a
new incident or occurrence in the last seven years.
(C) The person has not been convicted of a misdemeanor during the
past five years.
(D) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court for any crime
of which the person has been convicted has been paid in full, provided that
payment of surcharges shall not be required if the surcharges have been waived
by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
(E) After considering the particular nature of any subsequent offense,
the court finds that expungement of the criminal history record for the
qualifying crime serves the interests of justice.
(2) The court shall grant the petition and order that all or part of the
criminal history record be sealed pursuant to section 7607 of this title if the
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 24 of 86
conditions of subdivisions (1)(A), (B), (C), and (D) of this subsection are met
and the court finds that:
(A) sealing the criminal history record better serves the interests of
justice than expungement; and
(B) the person committed the qualifying crime after reaching 19
years of age.
(d) For petitions filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section,
unless the court finds that expungement would not be in the interests of justice,
the court shall grant the petition and order that the criminal history record be
expunged in accordance with section 7606 of this title if the following
conditions are met:
(1) The petitioner has completed any sentence or supervision for the
offense.
(2) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court have been paid
in full, provided that payment of surcharges shall not be required if the
surcharges have been waived by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
(e) For petitions filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section for a
conviction for possession of a regulated drug under 18 V.S.A. chapter 84,
subchapter 1 in an amount that is no longer prohibited by law or for which
criminal sanctions have been removed:
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 25 of 86
(1) The petitioner shall bear the burden of establishing that his or her
conviction was based on possessing an amount of regulated drug that is no
longer prohibited by law or for which criminal sanctions have been removed.
(2) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the amount of the
regulated drug specified in the affidavit of probable cause associated with the
petitioner’s conviction was the amount possessed by the petitioner.
(f) Prior to granting an expungement or sealing under this section for
petitions filed pursuant to subdivision 7601(4)(D) of this title, the court shall
make a finding that the conduct underlying the conviction under section 1201
of this title did not constitute a burglary into an occupied dwelling, as defined
in subdivision 1201(b)(2) of this title. The petitioner shall bear the burden of
establishing this fact.
(g) For petitions filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this section, only
petitions to seal may be considered or granted by the court. This subsection
shall not apply to an individual licensed as a commercial driver pursuant to
23 V.S.A. chapter 39. Unless the court finds that sealing would not be in the
interests of justice, the court shall grant the petition and order that the criminal
history record be sealed in accordance with section 7607 of this title if the
following conditions are met:
(1) At least 10 years have elapsed since the date on which the person
successfully completed the terms and conditions of the sentence for the
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 26 of 86
conviction, or if the person has successfully completed the terms and
conditions of an indeterminate term of probation that commenced at least
10 years previously.
(2) At the time of the filing of the petition:
(A) the person has only one conviction of a violation of 23 V.S.A.
§ 1201, which shall be construed in accordance with 23 V.S.A. § 1211; and
(B) the person has not been convicted of a crime arising out of a new
incident or occurrence since the person was convicted of a violation of
23 V.S.A. § 1201(a).
(3) Any restitution ordered by the court has been paid in full.
(4) The court finds that sealing of the criminal history record serves the
interests of justice.
(h) For petitions filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(D) of this section,
unless the court finds that expungement or sealing would not be in the interests
of justice, the court shall grant the petition and order that the criminal history
record be expunged or sealed in accordance with section 7606 or 7607 of this
title if the following conditions are met:
(1) At least 15 years have elapsed since the date on which the person
successfully completed the terms and conditions of the sentence for the
conviction, or the person has successfully completed the terms and conditions
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 27 of 86
of an indeterminate term of probation that commenced at least 15 years
previously.
(2) The person has not been convicted of a crime arising out of a new
incident or occurrence since the person was convicted of a violation of
subdivision 1201(c)(3)(A) of this title.
(3) Any restitution ordered by the court has been paid in full.
(4) The court finds that expungement or sealing of the criminal history
record serves the interests of justice. Petition.
(1) A person may file a petition with the court requesting sealing of a
criminal history record related to a conviction under the following
circumstances:
(A) The person was convicted of an offense for which the underlying
conduct is no longer prohibited by law or designated as a criminal offense.
(B) The person was convicted of a qualifying crime or qualifying
crimes arising out of the same incident or occurrence.
(2) Whichever office prosecuted the offense resulting in the conviction,
the State’s Attorney or Attorney General, shall be the respondent in the matter
unless the prosecuting office authorizes the other to act as the respondent.
(3) The court shall grant the petition without hearing if the petitioner
and the respondent stipulate to the granting of the petition. The respondent
shall file the stipulation with the court, and the court shall issue the petitioner
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 28 of 86
an order of sealing and provide notice of the order in accordance with this
section.
(4) This section shall not apply to an individual who is the holder of a
commercial driver’s license or commercial driver’s permit pursuant to
23 V.S.A. chapter 39 seeking to seal a record of a conviction for a
misdemeanor or felony offense committed in a motor vehicle as defined in
23 V.S.A. § 4.
(b) Offenses that are no longer prohibited by law. For petitions filed
pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section, the court shall grant the
petition and order that the criminal history record be sealed if the following
conditions are met:
(1) The petitioner has completed any sentence or supervision for the
offense.
(2) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court have been paid
in full, provided that payment of surcharges shall not be required if the
surcharges have been waived by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
(c) Qualifying misdemeanors. For petitions filed to seal a qualifying
misdemeanor pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, the court shall
grant the petition and order that the criminal history record be sealed if the
following conditions are met:
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 29 of 86
(1) At least three years have elapsed since the date on which the person
completed the terms and conditions of the sentence.
(2) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court for any crime of
which the person has been convicted has been paid in full, provided that
payment of surcharges shall not be required if the surcharges have been waived
by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
(3) The person does not have a pending criminal charge.
(4) The respondent has failed to show that sealing would be contrary to
the interest of justice.
(d) Qualifying felony offenses. For petitions filed to seal a qualifying
felony pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, the court shall grant the
petition and order that the criminal history record be sealed if the following
conditions are met:
(1) At least seven years have elapsed since the date on which the person
completed the terms and conditions of the sentence.
(2) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court for any crime of
which the person has been convicted has been paid in full, provided that
payment of surcharges shall not be required if the surcharges have been waived
by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
(3) The person does not have a pending criminal charge.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 30 of 86
(4) The respondent has failed to show that sealing would be contrary to
the interest of justice.
(e) Qualifying DUI misdemeanor. For petitions filed to seal a qualifying
DUI misdemeanor pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, the court
shall grant the petition and order that the criminal history record be sealed if
the following conditions are met:
(1) At least 10 years have elapsed since the date on which the person
completed the terms and conditions of the sentence.
(2) Any restitution and surcharges ordered by the court for any crime of
which the person has been convicted has been paid in full, provided that
payment of surcharges shall not be required if the surcharges have been waived
by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
(3) The person does not have a pending criminal charge.
(4) The person is not the holder of a commercial driver’s license or
commercial driver’s permit pursuant to 23 V.S.A. chapter 39.
(5) The respondent has failed to show that sealing would be contrary to
the interest of justice.
(f) Fish and wildlife offenses. Sealing a criminal history record related to a
fish and wildlife offense shall not void any fish and wildlife license suspension
or revocation imposed pursuant to the accumulation of points related to the
sealed offense. Points accumulated by a person shall remain on the person’s
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 31 of 86
license and, if applicable, completion of the remedial course shall be required,
as set forth in 10 V.S.A. § 4502.
§ 7603. EXPUNGEMENT AND SEALING OF RECORD, NO
CONVICTION; PROCEDURE
(a) Unless either party objects in the interests of justice, the court shall
issue an order sealing the criminal history record related to the citation or arrest
of a person:
(1) within 60 days after the final disposition of the case if:
(A) the court does not make a determination of probable cause at the
time of arraignment; or
(B) the charge is dismissed before trial with or without prejudice; or
(C) the defendant is acquitted of the charges; or
(2) at any time if the prosecuting attorney and the defendant stipulate
that the court may grant the petition to seal the record.
(b) If a party objects to sealing or expunging a record pursuant to this
section, the court shall schedule a hearing to determine if sealing or expunging
the record serves the interests of justice. The defendant and the prosecuting
attorney shall be the only parties in the matter.
(c), (d) [Repealed.]
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 32 of 86
(e) Unless either party objects in the interests of justice, the court shall
issue an order expunging a criminal history record related to the citation or
arrest of a person:
(1) within 60 days after the final disposition of the case if:
(A) the defendant is acquitted of the charges; or
(B) the charge is dismissed with prejudice;
(2) at any time if the prosecuting attorney and the defendant stipulate
that the court may grant the petition to expunge the record. [Repealed.]
(f) Unless either party objects in the interests of justice, the court shall issue
an order to expunge a record sealed pursuant to subsection (a) or (g) of this
section eight years after the date on which the record was sealed. [Repealed.]
(g) A person may file a petition with the court requesting sealing or
expungement of a criminal history record related to the citation or arrest of the
person at any time. The court shall grant the petition and issue an order sealing
or expunging the record if it finds that sealing or expunging the record serves
the interests of justice, or if the parties stipulate to sealing or expungement of
the record.
(h) The court may expunge any records that were sealed pursuant to this
section prior to July 1, 2018 unless the State’s Attorney’s office that
prosecuted the case objects. Thirty days prior to expunging a record pursuant
to this subsection, the court shall provide to the State’s Attorney’s office that
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 33 of 86
prosecuted the case written notice of its intent to expunge the record.
[Repealed.]
§ 7604. NEW CHARGE
If a person is charged with a criminal offense after he or she has filed a
petition for expungement pursuant to this chapter, the court shall not act on the
petition until disposition of the new charge. [Repealed.]
§ 7605. DENIAL OF PETITION
If a petition for expungement or sealing is denied by the court pursuant to
this chapter, no further petition shall be brought for at least two years, unless a
shorter duration is authorized by the court.
§ 7606. EFFECT OF EXPUNGEMENT
(a) Order and notice. Upon finding that the requirements for expungement
have been met, the court shall issue an order that shall include provisions that
its effect is to annul the record of the arrest, conviction, and sentence and that
such person shall be treated in all respects as if the person had never been
arrested, convicted, or sentenced for the offense. The court shall provide
notice of the expungement to the respondent, Vermont Crime Information
Center (VCIC), the arresting agency, the Restitution Unit of the Vermont
Center for Crime Victim Services, and any other entity that may have a record
related to the order to expunge. The VCIC shall provide notice of the
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 34 of 86
expungement to the Federal Bureau of Investigation’s National Crime
Information Center.
(b) Effect.
(1) Upon entry of an expungement order, the order shall be legally
effective immediately and the person whose record is expunged shall be treated
in all respects as if he or she had never been arrested, convicted, or sentenced
for the offense.
(2) In any application for employment, license, or civil right or privilege
or in an appearance as a witness in any proceeding or hearing, a person may be
required to answer questions about a previous criminal history record only with
respect to arrests or convictions that have not been expunged.
(3) The response to an inquiry from any person regarding an expunged
record shall be that “NO CRIMINAL RECORD EXISTS.”
(4) Nothing in this section shall affect any right of the person whose
record has been expunged to rely on it as a bar to any subsequent proceedings
for the same offense.
(c) Process.
(1) The court shall remove the expunged offense from any accessible
database that it maintains.
(2) Until all charges on a docket are expunged, the case file shall remain
publicly accessible.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 35 of 86
(3) When all charges on a docket have been expunged, the case file shall
be destroyed pursuant to policies established by the Court Administrator.
(d) Special index.
(1) The court shall keep a special index of cases that have been
expunged together with the expungement order. The index shall list only the
name of the person convicted of the offense, his or her date of birth, the docket
number, and the criminal offense that was the subject of the expungement.
(2) The special index and related documents specified in subdivision (1)
of this subsection shall be confidential and shall be physically and
electronically segregated in a manner that ensures confidentiality and that
limits access to authorized persons.
(3) Inspection of the expungement order may be permitted only upon
petition by the person who is the subject of the case. The Chief Superior Judge
may permit special access to the index and the documents for research
purposes pursuant to the rules for public access to court records.
(4) [Repealed].
(5) The Court Administrator shall establish policies for implementing
this subsection. [Repealed.]
§ 7607. EFFECT OF SEALING
(a) Order and notice. Upon entry of an order to seal, the order shall be
legally effective immediately and the person whose record is sealed shall be
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 36 of 86
treated in all respects as if the person had never been arrested, convicted, or
sentenced for the offense and that its effect is to annul the record of arrest,
conviction, and sentence. The court shall provide notice of the sealing to the
respondent, Vermont Crime Information Center (VCIC), the arresting agency,
the Restitution Unit of the Vermont Center for Crime Victim Services, and any
other entity that may have a record related to the order to seal send a copy of
any order sealing a criminal history record to all of the parties and attorneys
representing the parties, including to the prosecuting agency that prosecuted
the offense, the Vermont Crime Information Center (VCIC), the arresting
agency, and any other entity that may have a record subject to the sealing
order. VCIC shall provide notice of the sealing order to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation’s National Crime Information Center. The VCIC shall provide
notice of the sealing to the Federal Bureau of Investigation’s National Crime
Information Center.
(b) Effect.
(1) Except as provided in subdivision subsection (c) of this section,
upon entry of a sealing order, the order shall be legally effective immediately
and the person whose record is sealed shall be treated in all respects as if he or
she the person had never been arrested, convicted, or sentenced for the offense.
(2) In any application for employment, license, or civil right or privilege
or in an appearance as a witness in any proceeding or hearing, a person may be
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 37 of 86
required to answer questions about a previous criminal history record only with
respect to arrests or convictions that have not been sealed.
(3) The response to an inquiry from any member of the public regarding
a sealed record shall be that “NO CRIMINAL RECORD EXISTS.”
(4) Nothing in this section shall affect any right of the person whose
record has been sealed to rely on it as a bar to any subsequent proceeding for
the same offense.
(c) Exceptions. A party seeking to use a sealed criminal history record in a
court proceeding shall, prior to any use of the record in open court or in a
public filing, notify the court of the party’s intent to do so. The court shall
thereafter determine whether the record may be used prior its disclosure in the
proceeding. This shall not apply to the use of a sealed record pursuant to
subdivision (2), (3), (4), or (7) of this subsection. Use of a sealed document
pursuant to an exception shall not change the effect of sealing under subsection
(b) of this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or a sealing
order, entities may access and use sealed records in the following
circumstances, and the sealed record shall remain otherwise confidential:
(1) An entity or person that possesses a sealed record may continue to
use it for any litigation or claim arising out of the same incident or occurrence
or involving the same defendant.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 38 of 86
(2) A criminal justice agency as defined in 20 V.S.A. § 2056a and the
Attorney General may use the criminal history record sealed in accordance
with section 7602 or 7603 of this title without limitation for criminal justice
purposes as defined in 20 V.S.A. § 2056a.
(3) A sealed record of a prior violation of 23 V.S.A. § 1201(a) shall be
admissible as a predicate offense for the purpose of imposing an enhanced
penalty for a subsequent violation of that section, in accordance with the
provisions of 23 V.S.A. § 1210.
(4) A person or a court in possession of an order issued by a court
regarding a matter that was subsequently sealed may file or cite to that decision
in any subsequent proceeding. The party or court filing or citing to that
decision shall ensure that information regarding the identity of the defendant in
the sealed record is redacted.
(5) The Vermont Crime Information Center and Criminal Justice
Information Services Division of the Federal Bureau of Investigations shall
have access to sealed criminal history records without limitation for the
purpose of responding to queries to the National Instant Criminal Background
Check System regarding firearms transfers and attempted transfers.
(6) The State’s Attorney and Attorney General may disclose information
contained in a sealed criminal history record when required to meet their
otherwise legally required discovery obligations.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 39 of 86
(7) The person whose criminal history records have been sealed
pursuant to this chapter and the person’s attorney may access and use the
sealed records in perpetuity and shall not be subject to the 10-year limitation.
(8) A law enforcement agency may inspect and receive copies of the
sealed criminal history records of any applicant who applies to the agency to
be a law enforcement officer or a current employee for the purpose of internal
investigation.
(9) Persons or entities conducting research shall have access to a sealed
criminal history record to carry out research pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2056b in
perpetuity and shall not be subject to the 10-year limitation.
(10) Upon adopting rules outlining a process for handling sealed records
and maintaining confidentiality and the standards for determining when
information contained in a sealed record may be used for the purpose of
licensing decisions, the Vermont Criminal Justice Council may inspect and
receive copies of sealed criminal history records. Access to such records shall
not be permitted if the Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules objects
to some or all of the rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 842(b) and files the objection
or objections in certified form pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 842(c). Sealed records
shall remain confidential and not be available for inspection and copying
unless and until the Council relies on such records in a public licensing
decision.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 40 of 86
(11) Upon adopting rules outlining a process for handling sealed records
and maintaining confidentiality and the standards for determining when
information contained in a sealed record may be used for the purpose of
licensing decisions, the Vermont Office of Professional Regulation may
inspect and receive copies of sealed criminal history records. Access to such
records shall not be permitted if the Legislative Committee on Administrative
Rules objects to some or all of the rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 842(b) and files
the objection or objections in certified form pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 842(c).
Sealed records shall remain confidential and not be available for inspection and
copying unless and until the Office relies on such records in a public licensing
decision.
(12) Upon adopting rules outlining a process for handling sealed records
and maintaining confidentiality and the standards for determining when
information contained in a sealed record may be used for the purpose of
licensing decisions, the Vermont Board of Medical Practice may inspect and
receive copies of sealed criminal history records. Access to such records shall
not be permitted if the Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules objects
to some or all of the rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 842(b) and files the objection
or objections in certified form pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 842(c). Sealed records
shall remain confidential and not be available for inspection and copying
unless and until the Board relies on such records in a public licensing decision.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 41 of 86
(d) Process.
(1) The court shall bar viewing of the sealed offense in any accessible
database that it maintains.
(2) Until all charges on a docket have been sealed, the case file shall
remain publicly accessible.
(3) When all charges on a docket have been sealed, the case file shall
become exempt from public access.
(4) When a sealing order is issued by the court, any person or entity,
except the court, that possesses criminal history records shall:
(A) bar viewing of the sealed offense in any accessible database that
it maintains or remove information pertaining to the sealed records from any
publicly accessible database that the person or entity maintains; and
(B) clearly label the criminal history record as “SEALED” to ensure
compliance with this section.
(e) Special index.
(1) The court shall keep a special index of cases that have been sealed
together with the sealing order. The index shall list only the name of the
person convicted of the offense, his or her the person’s date of birth, the docket
number, and the criminal offense that was the subject of the sealing.
(2) The special index and related documents specified in subdivision (1)
of this subsection shall be confidential and shall be physically and
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 42 of 86
electronically segregated in a manner that ensures confidentiality and that
limits access to authorized persons.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, inspection of the
sealing order may be permitted only upon petition by the person who is the
subject of the case. The Chief Superior Judge may permit special access to the
index and the documents for research purposes pursuant to the rules for public
access to court records.
(4) The Court Administrator shall establish policies for implementing
this subsection. [Repealed.]
(f) Victims Compensation Program. Upon request, the Victim’s Victims
Compensation Program shall be provided with a copy, redacted of all
information identifying the offender, of the affidavit for the sole purpose of
verifying the expenses in a victim’s compensation application submitted
pursuant to section 5353 of this title.
(g) Restitution. The sealing of a criminal record shall not affect the
authority of the Restitution Unit to enforce a restitution order in the same
manner as a civil judgment pursuant to subdivision 5362(c)(2) of this title.
§ 7608. VICTIMS
(a) At the time a petition is filed pursuant to this chapter, the respondent
shall give notice of the petition to any victim of the offense who is known to
the respondent. The victim shall have the right to offer the respondent a
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 43 of 86
statement prior to any stipulation or to offer the court a statement. The
disposition of the petition shall not be unnecessarily delayed pending receipt of
a victim’s statement. The respondent’s inability to locate a victim after a
reasonable effort has been made shall not be a bar to granting a petition.
(b) As used in this section, “reasonable effort” means attempting to contact
the victim by first-class mail at the victim’s last known address and, by
telephone at the victim’s last known phone number, and by email at the
victim’s last known email address.
§ 7609. EXPUNGEMENT SEALING OF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
OF AN INDIVIDUAL 18–21 YEARS OF AGE
(a) Procedure. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the
record of the criminal proceedings for an individual who was 18–21 years of
age at the time the individual committed a qualifying crime shall be expunged
sealed within 30 days after the date on which the individual successfully
completed the terms and conditions of the sentence for the conviction of the
qualifying crime, absent a finding of good cause by the court. The court shall
issue an order to expunge seal all records and files related to the arrest,
citation, investigation, charge, adjudication of guilt, criminal proceedings, and
probation related to the sentence. A copy of the order shall be sent to each
agency, department, or official named in the order. Thereafter, the court, law
enforcement officers, agencies, and departments shall reply to any request for
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 44 of 86
information that no record exists with respect to such individual.
Notwithstanding this subsection, the record shall not be expunged sealed until
restitution and surcharges have been paid in full, provided that payment of
surcharges shall not be required if the surcharges have been waived by the
court pursuant to section 7282 of this title.
(b) Exceptions.
(1) A criminal record that includes both qualifying and nonqualifying
offenses shall not be eligible for expungement sealing pursuant to this section.
(2) The Vermont Crime Information Center shall retain a special index
of sentences for sex offenses that require registration pursuant to chapter 167,
subchapter 3 of this title. This index shall only list the name and date of birth
of the subject of the expunged sealed files and records, the offense for which
the subject was convicted, and the docket number of the proceeding that was
the subject of the expungement sealing. The special index shall be confidential
and shall be accessed only by the Director of the Vermont Crime Information
Center and an individual designated for the purpose of providing information
to the Department of Corrections in the preparation of a presentence
investigation in accordance with 28 V.S.A. §§ 204 and 204a.
(c) Petitions. An individual who was 18–21 years of age at the time the
individual committed a qualifying crime may file a petition with the court
requesting expungement sealing of the criminal history record related to the
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 45 of 86
qualifying crime after 30 days have elapsed since the individual completed the
terms and conditions for the sentence for the qualifying crime. The court shall
grant the petition and issue an order sealing or expunging the record if it finds
that sealing or expunging the record serves the interests of justice.
§ 7610. CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD SEALING SPECIAL FUND
There is established the Criminal History Record Sealing Special Fund,
which shall be managed in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5.
Fees collected pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 1431(e) for the filing of a petition to
seal a criminal history record of a violation of 23 V.S.A. § 1201(a) shall be
deposited into and credited to this Fund. This Fund shall be available to the
Office of the Court Administrator, the Department of State’s Attorneys and
Sheriffs, the Department of Motor Vehicles, and the Vermont Crime
Information Center to offset the administrative costs of sealing such records.
Balances in the Fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be carried forward and
remain in the Fund.
§ 7611. UNAUTHORIZED DISCLOSURE
A State or municipal employee or contractor or any agent of the court,
including an attorney and an employee or contractor of the attorney, who
knowingly accesses or discloses sealed criminal history record information
without authorization shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 46 of 86
$1,000.00. Each unauthorized disclosure shall constitute a separate civil
violation.
Sec. 11. 13 V.S.A. § 7041 is amended to read:
§ 7041. DEFERRED SENTENCE
(a) Upon an adjudication of guilt and after the filing of a presentence
investigation report, the court may defer sentencing and place the respondent
on probation upon such terms and conditions as it may require if a written
agreement concerning the deferring of sentence is entered into between the
State’s Attorney and the respondent and filed with the clerk of the court.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the court may defer
sentencing and place the respondent on probation without a written agreement
between the State’s Attorney and the respondent if the following conditions are
met:
(1) [Repealed.]
(2) the crime for which the respondent is being sentenced is not a listed
crime as defined in subdivision 5301(7) of this title;
(3) the court orders a presentence investigation in accordance with the
procedures set forth in V.R.C.P. Rule 32, unless the State’s Attorney agrees to
waive the presentence investigation;
(4) the court permits the victim to submit a written or oral statement
concerning the consideration of deferment of sentence;
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 47 of 86
(5) the court reviews the presentence investigation and the victim’s
impact statement with the parties; and
(6) the court determines that deferring sentence is in the interests of
justice.
(c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the court may
not defer a sentence for a violation of section 3253a (aggravated sexual assault
of a child), section 2602 (lewd and lascivious conduct with a child unless the
victim and the defendant were within five years of age and the act was
consensual), 3252(c) (sexual assault of a child under 16 years of age unless the
victim and the defendant were within five years of age and the act was
consensual), 3252(d) or (e) (sexual assault of a child), 3253(a)(8) (aggravated
sexual assault), or 3253a (aggravated sexual assault of a child) of this title, or
for violation of a listed crime as provided in subdivision 5301 if the defendant
has a prior conviction for a listed crime.
(d) Entry of deferment of sentence shall constitute an appealable judgment
for purposes of appeal in accordance with 12 V.S.A. § 2383 and V.R.A.P.
Rule 3. Except as otherwise provided, entry of deferment of sentence shall
constitute imposition of sentence solely for the purpose of sentence review in
accordance with section 7042 of this title. The court may impose sentence at
any time if the respondent violates the conditions of the deferred sentence
during the period of deferment.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 48 of 86
(e) Upon violation of the terms of probation or of the deferred sentence
agreement, the court shall impose sentence. Upon fulfillment of the terms of
probation and of the deferred sentence agreement, the court shall strike the
adjudication of guilt and discharge the respondent. Except as provided in
subsection (h) of this section, the record of the criminal proceedings shall be
expunged sealed upon the discharge of the respondent from probation, absent a
finding of good cause by the court. The court shall issue an order to expunge
seal all records and files related to the arrest, citation, investigation, charge,
adjudication of guilt, criminal proceedings, and probation related to the
deferred sentence. Copies of the order shall be sent to each agency,
department, or official named therein. Thereafter, the court, law enforcement
officers, agencies, and departments shall reply to any request for information
that no record exists with respect to such person upon inquiry in the matter.
Notwithstanding this subsection, the record shall not be expunged sealed until
restitution has been paid in full.
(f) A deferred sentence imposed under subsection (a) or (b) of this section
may include a restitution order issued pursuant to section 7043 of this title.
Nonpayment of restitution shall not constitute grounds for imposition of the
underlying sentence.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 49 of 86
(g) [Repealed.]
(h) The Vermont Crime Information Center shall retain a special index of
deferred sentences for sex offenses that require registration pursuant to
subchapter 3 of chapter 167 of this title. This index shall only list the name
and date of birth of the subject of the expunged sealed files and records, the
offense for which the subject was convicted, and the docket number of the
proceeding that was the subject of the expungement sealing. The special index
shall be confidential and may be accessed only by the director of the Vermont
Crime Information Center and a designated clerical staffperson for the purpose
of providing information to the Department of Corrections in the preparation of
a presentence investigation in accordance with 28 V.S.A. §§ 204 and 204a.
Sec. 12. 24 V.S.A. § 2002 is added to read:
§ 2002. EXPUNGEMENT OF MUNICIPAL VIOLATION RECORDS
(a) Expungement. Two years following the satisfaction of a judgment
resulting from an adjudication of a municipal violation, the Judicial Bureau
shall make an entry of “expunged” and notify the municipality of such action,
provided the person has not been adjudicated for any subsequent municipal
violations during that time. The data transfer to the municipality shall include
the name, date of birth, ticket number, and offense. Violations of offenses
adopted pursuant to chapter 117 of this title shall not be eligible for
expungement under this section.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 50 of 86
(b) Effect of expungement.
(1) Upon entry of an expungement order, the order shall be legally
effective immediately and the individual whose record is expunged shall be
treated in all respects as if the individual had never been adjudicated of the
violation.
(2) Upon an entry of expunged, the case will be accessible only by the
Clerk of the Court for the Judicial Bureau or the Clerk’s designee.
Adjudications that have been expunged shall not appear in the results of any
Judicial Bureau database search by name, date of birth, or any other data
identifying the defendant. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section,
any documents or other records related to an expunged adjudication that are
maintained outside the Judicial Bureau’s case management system shall be
destroyed.
(3) Upon receiving an inquiry from any person regarding an expunged
record, the Judicial Bureau and the municipality shall respond that “NO
RECORD EXISTS.”
(c) Exception for research entities. Research entities that maintain
adjudication records for purposes of collecting, analyzing, and disseminating
criminal justice data shall not be subject to the expungement requirements
established in this section. Research entities shall abide by the policies
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 51 of 86
established by the Court Administrator and shall not disclose any identifying
information from the records they maintain.
(d) Policies for implementation. The Court Administrator shall establish
policies for implementing this section.
(e) Application. This section shall apply to municipal violations that occur
on and after July 1, 2025.
Sec. 13. 23 V.S.A. § 2303 is amended to read:
§ 2303. EXPUNGEMENT OF VIOLATION RECORDS
* * *
(e) Application. This section shall apply to motor vehicle violations that
occur on and after July 1, 2021.
* * * Recidivism * * *
Sec. 14. FINDINGS AND INTENT
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds:
(1) The State’s current definition of recidivism is based upon offenders
who are sentenced to more than one year of incarceration and who, after
release, return to an incarcerative setting within three years, but only after
conviction of a new offense or a violation of Department of Corrections’
supervision and the new sentence for the violation is not fewer than 90 days.
(2) The vast majority of misdemeanor crimes have maximum terms of
imprisonment of not more than six months.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 52 of 86
(3) Few, if any, misdemeanor sentences are served in a Department of
Corrections’ facility.
(4) Under current law, a person could commit 10 instances of retail theft
within a calendar year, be convicted of each separate offense and sentenced to
probation or incarcerative sentences of a few days for each offense, and the
behavior would not constitute recidivism.
(b) Intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) the definition of recidivism more accurately reflect new convictions,
returns to incarceration, and probation violations and revocations; and
(2) the State establish a statutory measure of violent crime recidivism
and of individual success.
Sec. 15. 28 V.S.A. § 3 is amended to read:
§ 3. GENERAL DEFINITIONS
As used in this title:
(1) “Child” means any person:
(A) charged with having committed a delinquent act as defined in
33 V.S.A. § 5102 or adjudicated a delinquent and committed to the custody of
the Commissioner; or
(B) charged with being or adjudicated unmanageable as defined by
33 V.S.A. § 5102(3)(C) and (D), and committed to the custody of the
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 53 of 86
Commissioner for Children and Families and subsequently transferred to the
custody of the Commissioner.
(C) [Repealed.]
(2) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Corrections.
(3) “Correctional facility” or “facility” means any building, enclosure,
space, or structure of or supported by the Department and used for the
confinement of persons committed to the custody of the Commissioner, or for
any other matter related to such confinement.
(4) “Department” means the Department of Corrections.
(5) “Desistance” means the process by which criminality, or the
individual risk for antisocial conduct, declines over the life-course of the
individual, generally after adolescence.
(6) “Inmate” means any person, not a child, committed to the custody of
the Commissioner pursuant to the law of the State and subsequently committed
to a correctional facility and any person confined at a correctional facility
during the pendency of a prosecution against him or her the person.
(6)(7) “Law” includes the laws and ordinances of the State, its political
subdivisions, and municipalities.
(7)(8) “Law enforcement officer” means a State Police officer, a sheriff,
a deputy sheriff, a municipal police officer, a constable, the Commissioner, or
a member of the Department of Corrections when appointed in writing by the
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 54 of 86
Commissioner and when his or her the appointment is filed in the Office of the
Secretary of State. The Commissioner or such member shall have the same
powers as a sheriff.
(9) “Listed crime” has the same definition as in 13 V.S.A. § 5301(7).
(8)(10) “Offender” means any person convicted of a crime or offense
under the laws of this State, and, for purposes of work crew community
restitution, a person found in civil contempt under 15 V.S.A. § 603.
(9)(11) “Supervising officer” means the highest administrative officer in
charge of any correctional facility.
(10)(12) “Correctional officer” means any person who is an employee of
the Department of Corrections whose official duties or job classification
includes the supervision or monitoring of a person on parole, probation, or
serving any sentence of incarceration whether inside or outside a correctional
facility, and who has received training, as approved by the Commissioner of
Corrections, as provided in section 551a of this title.
(13) “Recidivism” means an individual’s relapse into committing a
criminal offense after receiving criminal sanctions for a previous crime.
(14) “Repeat violent offender” means an individual who commits
repeated criminal offenses for which the offense is against another individual
and is considered significant and violent.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 55 of 86
(11)(15) “Restorative justice program” means a program developed and
implemented by the Commissioner, consistent with State policy and legislative
intent as provided by section 2a of this title.
(12)(16) Despite other names this concept has been given in the past or
may be given in the future, “segregation” means a form of separation from the
general population that may or may not include placement in a single-
occupancy cell and that is used for disciplinary, administrative, or other
reasons, but shall not mean confinement to an infirmary or a residential
treatment setting for purposes of evaluation, treatment, or provision of
services.
Sec. 16. 28 V.S.A. § 4 is amended to read:
§ 4. STANDARD MEASURE AND CLASSIFICATIONS OF RECIDIVISM;
DESISTANCE; REPEAT VIOLENT OFFENDERS
(a) Recidivism. The Department shall calculate the rate of recidivism
based upon offenders individuals who are sentenced to more than one year of
incarceration who, after release from incarceration, return to prison within
three years for a conviction for a new offense or a violation of supervision
resulting, and the new incarceration sentence or time served on the violation is
at least 90 days convicted of a criminal offense and meet one of the following
classifications:
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 56 of 86
(1) Class one recidivism. Less than two years elapse from the time of
sentencing before the individual is convicted of a new offense.
(2) Class two recidivism. Less than five years elapse from the time of
sentencing before the individual is convicted of a new offense.
(3) Class three recidivism. Less than 10 years elapse from the time of
sentencing before the individual is convicted of a new offense.
(b) Desistance. The Department shall calculate and classify the rate of
desistance based upon individuals who are convicted of a criminal offense and
meet one of the following classifications:
(1) Class one desistance. Less than 12 months elapse from the time of
sentencing before a judicial officer finds probable cause for a new offense.
(2) Class two desistance. Less than two years elapse from the time of
sentencing before a judicial officer finds probable cause for a new offense.
(3) Class three desistance. Less than five years elapse from the time of
sentencing before a judicial officer finds probable cause for a new offense.
(c) Repeat violent offenders. The Department shall calculate the rate of
repeat violent offenders based upon individuals who are convicted of a
criminal offense and meet one of the following classifications:
(1) Class one repeat violence. Less than two years elapse from the time
of sentencing before the individual is convicted of a listed offense.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 57 of 86
(2) Class two repeat violence. Less than five years elapse from the time
of sentencing before the individual is convicted of a listed offense.
(3) Class three repeat violence. Less than 10 years elapse from the time
of sentencing before the individual is convicted of a listed offense.
Sec. 17. 28 V.S.A. § 125(b) is amended to read:
(b) Definitions. As used in this section:
* * *
(3) “Desistance” means the process by which criminality, or the
individual risk for antisocial conduct, declines over the life-course of the
individual, generally after adolescence has the same meaning as in subsection
4(b) of this title.
* * *
(5) “Recidivism” has the same meaning as in section 4 3 of this title.
* * * Big 14 Juvenile Offenses * * *
Sec. 18. 33 V.S.A. § 5201 is amended to read:
§ 5201. COMMENCEMENT OF DELINQUENCY PROCEEDINGS
* * *
(c)(1) Any proceeding concerning a child who is alleged to have committed
an act specified in subsection 5204(a) of this title after attaining 14 years of
age, but not 22 years of age, shall originate in the Criminal Division of the
Superior Court, provided that jurisdiction may be transferred in accordance
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 58 of 86
with this chapter and chapter 52A of this title, unless the State’s Attorney files
the charge directly as a youthful offender petition in the Family Division.
(2)(A) Any proceeding concerning a child who is alleged to have
committed one of the following acts after attaining 14 years of age, but not 22
years of age, shall originate in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court,
provided that jurisdiction may be transferred in accordance with this chapter
and chapter 52A of this title, unless the State’s Attorney files the charge
directly as a youthful offender petition in the Family Division:
(i) a violation of a condition of release as defined in 13 V.S.A.
§ 7559 imposed by the Criminal Division for any of the offenses listed in
subsection 5204(a) of this title; or
(ii) a violation of a condition of release as defined in 13 V.S.A.
§ 7559 imposed by the Criminal Division for an offense that was transferred
from the Family Division pursuant to section 5204 of this title.
(B) This subdivision (2) shall not apply to a proceeding that is the
subject of a final order accepting the case for youthful offender treatment
pursuant to subsection 5281(d) (c) of this title.
(3) Any proceeding concerning a child who is alleged to have committed
one of the following acts after attaining 16 years of age, but not 22 years of
age, shall originate in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court, provided
that jurisdiction may be transferred in accordance with this chapter and chapter
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 59 of 86
52A of this title, unless the State’s Attorney files the charge directly as a
youthful offender petition in the Family Division:
(A) using a firearm while committing a felony in violation of 13
V.S.A. § 4005, or an attempt to commit that offense;
(B) trafficking a regulated drug in violation of 18 V.S.A. chapter 84,
subchapter 1, or an attempt to commit that offense; or
(C) aggravated stalking as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1063(a)(3), or an
attempt to commit that offense.
(d) Any proceeding concerning a child who is alleged to have committed
any offense other than those specified in subsection 5204(a) of this title or
subdivision (c)(2) or (3) of this section before attaining 19 years of age shall
originate in the Family Division of the Superior Court, provided that
jurisdiction may be transferred in accordance with this chapter.
* * *
Sec. 19. 33 V.S.A. § 5203 is amended to read:
§ 5203. TRANSFER FROM OTHER COURTS
(a) If it appears to a Criminal Division of the Superior Court that the
defendant was under 19 years of age at the time the offense charged was
alleged to have been committed and the offense charged is an offense not
specified in subsection 5204(a) or subdivision 5201(c)(2) or (3) of this title,
that court shall forthwith transfer the proceeding to the Family Division of the
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 60 of 86
Superior Court under the authority of this chapter, and the minor shall then be
considered to be subject to this chapter as a child charged with a delinquent
act.
(b) If it appears to a Criminal Division of the Superior Court that the
defendant had attained 14 years of age but not 18 years of age at the time an
offense specified in subsection 5204(a) or subdivision 5201(c)(2) or (3) of this
title was alleged to have been committed, that court may forthwith transfer the
proceeding to the Family Division of the Superior Court under the authority of
this chapter, and the minor shall then be considered to be subject to this chapter
as a child charged with a delinquent act.
(c) If it appears to the State’s Attorney that the defendant was under 19
years of age at the time the felony offense charged was alleged to have been
committed and the felony charged is not an offense specified in subsection
5204(a) or subdivision 5201(c)(2) or (3) of this title, the State’s Attorney shall
file charges in the Family Division of the Superior Court, pursuant to section
5201 of this title. The Family Division may transfer the proceeding to the
Criminal Division pursuant to section 5204 of this title.
* * *
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 61 of 86
Sec. 20. 33 V.S.A. § 5204 is amended to read:
§ 5204. TRANSFER FROM FAMILY DIVISION OF THE SUPERIOR
COURT
(a) After a petition has been filed alleging delinquency, upon motion of the
State’s Attorney and after hearing, the Family Division of the Superior Court
may transfer jurisdiction of the proceeding to the Criminal Division of the
Superior Court if the child had attained 16 years of age but not 19 years of age
at the time the act was alleged to have occurred and the delinquent act set forth
in the petition is a felony not specified in subdivisions (1)–(11)(30) of this
subsection or if the child had attained 12 years of age but not 14 years of age at
the time the act was alleged to have occurred, and if the delinquent act set forth
in the petition was any of the following:
(1) arson causing death as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 501 or an attempt to
commit that offense;
(2) assault and robbery with a dangerous weapon as defined in 13
V.S.A. § 608(b) or an attempt to commit that offense;
(3) assault and robbery causing bodily injury as defined in 13 V.S.A.
§ 608(c) or an attempt to commit that offense;
(4) aggravated assault as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1024 or an attempt to
commit that offense;
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 62 of 86
(5) murder as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2301 and aggravated murder as
defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2311 or an attempt to commit either of those offenses;
(6) manslaughter as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2304 or an attempt to
commit that offense;
(7) kidnapping as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2405 or an attempt to commit
that offense;
(8) unlawful restraint as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2406 or 2407 or an
attempt to commit that offense;
(9) maiming as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2701 or an attempt to commit
that offense;
(10) sexual assault as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 3252(a)(1) or (a)(2) or an
attempt to commit that offense; or
(11) aggravated sexual assault as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 3253 and
aggravated sexual assault of a child as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 3253a or an
attempt to commit either of those offenses;
(12) stalking as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1062 or aggravated stalking as
defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1063(a)(3) or an attempt to commit either of those
offenses;
(13) carrying a dangerous or deadly weapon while committing a felony
in violation of 13 V.S.A. § 4005 or an attempt to commit that offense;
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 63 of 86
(14) trafficking a regulated drug in violation of 18 V.S.A. chapter 84,
subchapter 1 or an attempt to commit that offense;
(15) domestic assault as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1042, first degree
aggravated domestic assault as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1043, and second degree
aggravated domestic assault as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1044 or an attempt to
commit any of those offenses;
(16) selling or dispensing a regulated drug with death resulting as
defined in 18 V.S.A. § 4250 or an attempt to commit that offense;
(17) using a firearm while selling or dispensing a regulated drug as
defined in 18 V.S.A. § 4253 or an attempt to commit that offense;
(18) lewd or lascivious conduct as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2601 or an
attempt to commit that offense;
(19) lewd or lascivious conduct with a child as defined in 13 V.S.A.
§ 2602 or an attempt to commit that offense;
(20) eluding a police officer with death or serious bodily injury resulting
as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 1133(b) or an attempt to commit that offense;
(21) willful and malicious injuries caused by explosives as defined in 13
V.S.A. § 1601, injuries caused by destructive devices as defined in 13 V.S.A.
§ 1605, and injuries caused by explosives as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1608 or an
attempt to commit any of those offenses;
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 64 of 86
(22) human trafficking as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2652 and aggravated
human trafficking as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2653 or an attempt to commit
either of those offenses;
(23) grand larceny as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2501 or an attempt to
commit that offense;
(24) larceny from the person as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 2503 or an
attempt to commit that offense;
(25) operating a vehicle under the influence of alcohol or any other drug
with death or serious bodily injury resulting as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 1210 or
an attempt to commit that offense;
(26) negligent or grossly negligent operation of a vehicle with death or
serious bodily injury resulting as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 1091 or an attempt to
commit that offense;
(27) leaving the scene of an accident with death or serious bodily injury
resulting as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 1128 or an attempt to commit that offense;
(28) commission of a hate motivated crime as defined in 13 V.S.A.
§ 1455 or an attempt to commit that offense;
(29) conspiracy as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1404 or an attempt to commit
that offense; or
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 65 of 86
(30) violation of an abuse prevention order, an order against stalking or
sexual assault, or a protective order concerning contact with a child as defined
in 13 V.S.A. § 1030 or an attempt to commit any of those offenses.
* * *
* * * Raise the Age * * *
Sec. 21. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 125, Secs. 7–11 are amended to read:
Sec. 7. [Deleted.]
Sec. 8. [Deleted.]
Sec. 9. [Deleted.]
Sec. 10. [Deleted.]
Sec. 11. [Deleted.]
Sec. 22. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 125, Sec. 21 is amended to read:
Sec. 21. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Secs. 1–6, 12–20, and this section shall take effect on July 1, 2024.
(b) Secs. 7–11 shall take effect on April 1, 2025. [Deleted.]
* * * Youthful Offenders * * *
Sec. 23. 33 V.S.A. § 5280 is amended to read:
§ 5280. COMMENCEMENT OF YOUTHFUL OFFENDER
PROCEEDINGS IN THE FAMILY DIVISION
(a) A youthful offender proceeding under this chapter shall be commenced
by:
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 66 of 86
(1) the filing of a youthful offender petition by a State’s Attorney in the
Criminal Division of the Superior Court; or
(2) transfer to the Family Court of a proceeding from the Criminal
Division of the Superior Court as provided in section 5281 of this title the
filing of a motion in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court by the State’s
Attorney, the defendant, or the court on its own motion requesting that a
defendant in a criminal proceeding who has attained 14 years of age but not 22
years of age at the time the offense is alleged to have been committed be
treated as a youthful offender; or
(3) the filing of a youthful offender petition in the Family Division of
the Superior Court concerning a child who is alleged to have committed an
offense after attaining 14 years of age but not 22 years of age that could
otherwise be filed in the Criminal Division.
(b) A State’s Attorney may commence a proceeding in the Family Division
of the Superior Court concerning a child who is alleged to have committed an
offense after attaining 14 years of age but not 22 years of age that could
otherwise be filed in the Criminal Division.
(1) Upon the filing of a motion under subdivision (a)(1) or (2) of this
section and the entering of a conditional plea of guilty by the youth, the
Criminal Division of the Superior Court shall enter an order deferring the
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 67 of 86
sentence and hold a hearing on the motion. If the youth declines to enter a
conditional plea, youthful offender status shall be denied.
(2) As used in this subsection, “conditional plea of guilty” means a plea
of guilty that is conditioned on the granting of youthful offender status that
may be withdrawn in the event that youthful offender status is denied.
(c) If a State’s Attorney files a petition under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section, the The case shall proceed as provided under subsection 5281(b) of
this title. Except as provided in subdivision 5283(c)(2) of this title, upon the
commencement of a youthful offender consideration proceeding in the Family
Division or the Criminal Division of the Superior Court, all future proceedings
regarding youthful offender status shall be sealed until youthful offender status
is denied or revoked.
(d)(1) Within 15 days after the Upon commencement of a youthful
offender proceeding pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the court shall
notify the youth that the youth is required to complete a risk and needs
screening, which shall be conducted by the Department or by a community
provider that has contracted with the Department to provide risk and needs
screenings. The notice shall inform the youth that youthful offender status
may be denied if the youth fails to participate in the risk and needs screening.
(2) The risk and needs screening shall be completed prior to the youthful
offender status hearing held pursuant to section 5283 of this title. Unless the
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 68 of 86
court extends the period for the risk and needs screening for good cause
shown, the Family Division court shall reject the case for youthful offender
treatment if the youth does not complete the risk and needs screening within 15
days after the offer for the risk and needs screening.
(3) The Department or the community provider shall report the risk level
result of the screening, the number and source of the collateral contacts made,
and the recommendation for charging or other alternatives to the State’s
Attorney.
(4) Information related to the present alleged offense directly or
indirectly derived from the risk and needs screening or other conversation with
the Department or community-based provider shall not be used against the
youth in the youth’s criminal or juvenile case for any purpose, including
impeachment or cross-examination. However, the fact of participation in risk
and needs screening may be used in subsequent proceedings.
(e) The State’s Attorney shall may refer directly to court diversion a youth
alleged to have committed any offense other than those specified in subsection
5204(a) of this title who presents a low to moderate risk to reoffend based on
the results of the risk and needs screening, unless the State’s Attorney states on
the record at the hearing held pursuant to section 5283 of this title why a
referral would not serve the ends of justice. If the court diversion program
does not accept the case or if the youth fails to complete the program in a
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 69 of 86
manner deemed satisfactory and timely by the provider, the youth’s case shall
return to the State’s Attorney for charging consideration.
Sec. 24. 33 V.S.A. § 5281 is amended to read:
§ 5281. MOTION PROCEDURES IN CRIMINAL DIVISION OF
SUPERIOR COURT
(a) A motion may be filed in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court
requesting that a defendant under 22 years of age in a criminal proceeding who
had attained 12 years of age but not 22 years of age at the time the offense is
alleged to have been committed be treated as a youthful offender. The motion
may be filed by the State’s Attorney, the defendant, or the court on its own
motion.
(b) Unless the State’s Attorney refers the youth directly to court diversion
pursuant to subsection 5280(e) of this title, upon the filing of a motion under
this section or the filing of a youthful offender petition pursuant to section
5280 of this title, the Family Division court shall hold a hearing pursuant to
section 5283 of this title. Pursuant to section 5110 of this title, the The hearing
shall be confidential as provided in section 5284 of this title. Copies of all
records relating to the case shall be forwarded to the Family Division.
Conditions of release and any Department of Corrections supervision or
custody shall remain in effect until:
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 70 of 86
(1) the Family Division accepts the case for treatment as a youthful
offender and orders conditions of juvenile probation pursuant to section 5284
of this title;
(2) any conditions of release or bail are modified, amended, or vacated
pursuant to 13 V.S.A. chapter 229; or
(3)(2) the case is otherwise concluded.
(c)(b)(1) If the Family Division court rejects the case for youthful offender
treatment pursuant to section 5284 of this title, the case shall be transferred to
the Criminal Division. The conditions of release imposed by the Criminal
Division shall remain in effect, and the case shall proceed as though the motion
for youthful offender treatment or youthful offender petition had not been
filed.
(2) Subject to Rule 11 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure and
Rule 410 of the Vermont Rules of Evidence, the Family Division’s court’s
denial of the motion for youthful offender treatment and any information
related to the youthful offender proceeding shall be inadmissible against the
youth for any purpose in the subsequent Criminal Division proceeding.
(d)(c) If the Family Division accepts the case for youthful offender
treatment, the case shall proceed to a confidential merits hearing or admission
pursuant to sections 5227-5229 of this title the youth shall not be permitted to
withdraw the youth’s plea of guilty after youthful offender status is approved
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 71 of 86
except to correct manifest injustice pursuant to Rule 32(d) of the Vermont
Rules of Criminal Procedure.
Sec. 25. 33 V.S.A. § 5282 is amended to read:
§ 5282. REPORT FROM THE DEPARTMENT
(a) Within 30 days after the youth has completed the risk and needs
screening pursuant to section 5280 of this title, unless the court extends the
period for good cause shown or the State’s Attorney refers the youth directly to
court diversion pursuant to subsection 5280(e) of this title, the Department for
Children and Families shall file a report with the Family Division of the
Superior Court.
(b) A report filed pursuant to this section shall include the following
elements:
(1) a recommendation as to whether diversion is appropriate for the
youth because the youth is a low to moderate risk to reoffend;
(2) a recommendation as to whether youthful offender status is
appropriate for the youth; and
(3) a description of the services that may be available for the youth.
(c) A report filed pursuant to this section is privileged and shall not be
disclosed to any person other than:
(1) the Department;
(2) the court;
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 72 of 86
(3) the State’s Attorney;
(4) the youth, the youth’s attorney, and the youth’s guardian ad litem;
(5) the youth’s parent, guardian, or custodian if the youth is under 18
years of age, unless the court finds that disclosure would be contrary to the best
interests of the child;
(6) the Department of Corrections; or
(7) any other person when the court determines that the best interests of
the youth would make such a disclosure desirable or helpful. [Repealed.]
Sec. 26. 33 V.S.A. § 5283 is amended to read:
§ 5283. DISPOSITION HEARING IN FAMILY DIVISION
(a) Timeline. Unless the State’s Attorney refers the youth directly to court
diversion pursuant to subsection 5280(e) of this title, a youthful offender
consideration disposition hearing shall be held not later than 60 days after the
transfer of the case from the Criminal Division or filing of a youthful offender
petition in the Family Division 45 days after the filing of a motion or the filing
of a youthful offender petition under section 5280 of this title.
(b) Notice. Notice of the hearing shall be provided to the State’s Attorney;
the youth; the youth’s parent, guardian, or custodian; the victim; the
Department; and the Department of Corrections. The court shall not exclude
any victim from the proceeding or any portion of it unless, after hearing from
the parties and the victim, the court makes a finding on the record of good
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 73 of 86
cause. As used in this subsection, “victim” means a person who is the victim
of a crime for which a youth is charged; a parent, guardian, or legal
representative of the victim; or a victim’s advocate.
(c) Hearing procedure.
(1) If the motion is contested, all parties shall have the right to present
evidence and examine witnesses. Hearsay may be admitted and may be relied
on to the extent of its probative value. If reports are admitted, the parties shall
be afforded an opportunity to examine those persons making the reports, but
sources of confidential information need not be disclosed.
(2) For individuals who had attained 18 years of age but not 22 years of
age at the time the act is alleged to have been committed, hearings under
5284(a) of this title shall be open to the public. All other youthful offender
proceedings shall be confidential.
(d) Burden of proof. The burden of proof shall be on the moving party to
prove by a preponderance of the evidence that a child should be granted
youthful offender status. If the court makes the motion, the burden shall be on
the youth.
(e) Further hearing. On its own motion or the motion of a party, the court
may schedule a further hearing to obtain reports or other information necessary
for the appropriate disposition of the case.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 74 of 86
Sec. 27. 33 V.S.A. § 5284 is amended to read:
§ 5284. YOUTHFUL OFFENDER DETERMINATION AND DISPOSITION
ORDER
(a)(1) In a hearing on a motion or petition for youthful offender status, the
court shall first consider whether public safety will be protected by treating the
youth as a youthful offender. If the court finds that public safety will not be
protected by treating the youth as a youthful offender, the court shall deny the
motion and transfer the case to the Criminal Division of the Superior Court
pursuant to subsection 5281(d) of this title, the conditions of release imposed
by the Criminal Division shall remain in effect, and the case shall proceed as
though the motion or petition for youthful offender treatment had not been
filed. If the court finds that public safety will be protected by treating the
youth as a youthful offender, the court shall proceed to make a determination
under subsection (b) of this section.
(2) When determining whether public safety will be protected by
treating the youth as a youthful offender, the court shall consider, on the basis
of the evidence admitted:
(A) the nature and circumstances of the charge and whether violence
was involved;
(B) the youth’s mental health treatment history and needs;
(C) the youth’s substance abuse history and needs;
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 75 of 86
(D) the youth’s residential housing status;
(E) the youth’s employment and educational situation;
(F) whether the youth has complied with conditions of release;
(G) the youth’s criminal record and whether the youth has engaged in
subsequent criminal or delinquent behavior since the original charge;
(H) whether supervising the youth on youthful offender probation is
appropriate considering the nature of the charged offense and the age and
specialized needs of the youth;
(I) whether the youth has connections to the community; and
(J) the youth’s history of violence and history of illegal or violent
conduct involving firearms or other deadly weapons.
(b)(1) The court shall deny the motion if the court finds that:
(A) public safety will not be protected by treating the youth as a
youthful offender;
(B) the youth is not amenable to treatment or rehabilitation as a
youthful offender; or
(B)(C) there are insufficient services in the juvenile court system and
the Department for Children and Families and the Department of Corrections
to meet the youth’s treatment and rehabilitation needs.
(2) The court shall grant the motion if the court finds that:
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 76 of 86
(A) public safety will be protected by treating the youth as a youthful
offender;
(B) the youth is amenable to treatment or rehabilitation as a youthful
offender; and
(B)(C) there are sufficient services in the juvenile court system and
the Department for Children and Families and the Department of Corrections
to meet the youth’s treatment and rehabilitation needs.
(c)(1) If the court approves the motion for youthful offender treatment after
an adjudication pursuant to subsection 5281(d) of this title, the court:
(A) shall place the youth on conditions of probation pursuant to 28
V.S.A. chapter 5, or such additional conditions imposed by the court, provided
that the requirements of this subdivision (A) may be satisfied by entering the
single condition of probation required under subdivision (C) of this subdivision
(c)(1);
(B) shall approve a disposition case plan and impose conditions of
juvenile probation on the youth; and
(C) shall include as a condition of probation adherence to the
disposition case plan approved by the court; and
(B)(D) may transfer legal custody of the youth to a parent, relative,
person with a significant relationship with the youth, or Commissioner of the
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 77 of 86
Department for Children and Families, provided that any transfer of custody
shall expire on the youth’s 18th birthday.
(2) Prior to the approval of a disposition case plan, the court may refer a
child directly to a youth-appropriate community-based provider that has been
approved by the department and which that may include a community justice
center or a balanced and restorative justice program. Referral to a community-
based provider pursuant to this subdivision shall not require the court to place
the child on probation. If the community-based provider does not accept the
case or if the child fails to complete the program in a manner deemed
satisfactory and timely by the provider, the child shall return to the court for
further proceedings, including the imposition of the disposition order.
(d)(1) The Department for Children and Families and the Department of
Corrections shall be responsible for supervision of and providing services to
the youth until the youth reaches 22 years of age the earlier of:
(A) the youth successfully completing treatment and supervision; or
(B) the revocation of the youth’s youthful offender designation
pursuant to section 5285 of this title.
(2) Both Departments the Department for Children and Families and the
Department of Corrections shall designate a case manager who together shall
appoint a lead Department department to have final decision-making authority
over the case plan and the provision of services to the youth. The youth shall
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 78 of 86
be eligible for appropriate community-based programming and services
provided by both Departments the Agency of Human Services.
Sec. 28. 33 V.S.A. § 5285 is amended to read:
§ 5285. MODIFICATION OR REVOCATION OF DISPOSITION
(a) If it appears that the youth has violated the terms of juvenile probation
ordered by the court pursuant to subdivision 5284(c)(1) of this title, a motion
for modification or revocation of youthful offender status may be filed in the
Family Division of the Superior Court. The court shall set the motion for
hearing as soon as practicable within 30 days. The hearing may be joined with
a hearing on a violation of conditions of probation under section 5265 of this
title. A Consistent with the procedures of 28 V.S.A. § 301, a supervising
juvenile or adult probation officer may detain in an adult facility a youthful
offender who has attained 18 years of age for violating conditions of probation.
A youthful offender who has not attained 18 years of age may be detained in a
facility for juveniles pursuant to section 5266 of this title. A youthful offender
who is detained prior to attaining 18 years of age may be transferred to an adult
facility after the offender attains 18 years of age.
(b) A hearing under this section shall be held in accordance with section
5268 of this title.
(c) If the court finds after the hearing that the youth has violated the terms
of his or her the youth’s probation, the court may:
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 79 of 86
(1) maintain the youth’s status as a youthful offender, with modified
conditions of juvenile probation if the court deems it appropriate;
(2) revoke the youth’s status as a youthful offender and transfer the case
with a record of the petition, affidavit, adjudication, disposition, and revocation
to the Criminal Division for sentencing; or
(3) transfer supervision of the youth to the Department of Corrections
with all of the powers and authority of the Department and the Commissioner
under Title 28, including graduated sanctions and electronic monitoring.
(d) If a youth’s status as a youthful offender is revoked and the case is
transferred to the Criminal Division pursuant to subdivision (c)(2) of this
section, the court shall enter a conviction of guilty based on the admission to or
finding of merits, hold a sentencing hearing, and impose sentence. Unless it
serves the interest of justice, the case shall not be transferred back to the
Family Division pursuant to section 5203 of this title. When determining an
appropriate sentence, the court may take into consideration the youth’s degree
of progress toward or regression from rehabilitation while on youthful offender
status. The Criminal Division shall have access to all Family Division records
of the proceeding.
Sec. 29. 33 V.S.A. § 5286 is amended to read:
§ 5286. REVIEW PRIOR TO 18 YEARS OF AGE
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 80 of 86
(a) If a youth is on probation as a youthful offender prior to reaching 18
years of age, the Family Division court shall review the youth’s case before he
or she the youth reaches 18 years of age and set a hearing to determine whether
the court’s jurisdiction over the youth should be continued past 18 years of
age. The hearing may be joined with a motion to terminate youthful offender
status under section 5285 of this title. The court shall provide notice and an
opportunity to be heard at the hearing to the State’s Attorney, the youth, the
Department for Children and Families, and the Department of Corrections.
(b) After receiving a notice of review under this section, the State may file
a motion to modify or revoke pursuant to section 5285 of this title. If such a
motion is filed, it shall be consolidated with the review under this section and
all options provided for under section 5285 of this title shall be available to the
court.
(c) The following reports shall be filed with the court prior to the hearing:
(1) The Department for Children and Families and the Department of
Corrections shall jointly report their recommendations, with supporting
justifications, as to whether the Family Division court should continue
jurisdiction over the youth past 18 years of age and, if continued jurisdiction is
recommended, propose a case plan for the youth to ensure compliance with
and completion of the juvenile disposition.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 81 of 86
(2) If the Departments departments recommend continued supervision
of the youthful offender past 18 years of age, the Departments departments
shall report on the services that would be available for the youth.
(d) If the court finds that it is in the best interests of the youth and
consistent with community safety to continue the case past 18 years of age, it
shall make an order continuing the court’s jurisdiction up to 22 years of age.
The Department for Children and Families and the Department of Corrections
shall jointly develop a case plan for the youth and coordinate services and
share information to ensure compliance with and completion of the juvenile
youthful offender disposition.
(e) If the court finds that it is not in the best interests of the youth to
continue the case past 18 years of age, it shall terminate the disposition order,
discharge the youth, and dismiss the case in accordance with subsection
5287(c) of this title.
Sec. 30. 33 V.S.A. § 5287 is amended to read:
§ 5287. TERMINATION OR CONTINUANCE OF PROBATION
(a) A motion or stipulation may be filed at any time in the Family Criminal
Division requesting that the court terminate the youth’s status as a youthful
offender and discharge him or her the youth from probation. The motion may
be filed by the State’s Attorney, the youth, the Department, or the court on its
own motion.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 82 of 86
(b) In determining whether a youth has successfully completed the terms of
probation, the court shall consider:
(1) the degree to which the youth fulfilled the terms of the case plan and
the probation order;
(2) the youth’s performance during treatment;
(3) reports of treatment personnel; and
(4) any other relevant facts associated with the youth’s behavior.
(c) If the court finds that the youth has successfully completed the terms of
the probation order, it shall terminate youthful offender status, discharge the
youth from probation, and file a written order dismissing the Family Division
case. The Family Division shall provide notice of the dismissal to the Criminal
Division, which shall dismiss the criminal case.
(d) Upon discharge and dismissal under subsection (c) of this section, all
records relating to the case in the Criminal Division shall be expunged, and all
records relating to the case in the Family Court shall be sealed pursuant to
section 5119 of this title sealed. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or
a sealing order, entities may access and use sealed records in the following
circumstances, and the sealed record shall remain otherwise confidential:
(1) An entity or person that possesses a sealed record may continue to
use it for any litigation or claim arising out of the same incident or occurrence.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 83 of 86
(2) A criminal justice agency as defined in 20 V.S.A. § 2056a and the
Attorney General may use the criminal history record sealed in accordance
with section 7602 or 7603 of this title for criminal justice purposes as defined
in 20 V.S.A. § 2056a.
(3) A sealed record of a prior violation of 23 V.S.A. § 1201(a) shall be
admissible as a predicate offense for the purpose of imposing an enhanced
penalty for a subsequent violation of that section, in accordance with the
provisions of 23 V.S.A. § 1210.
(4) A person or a court in possession of an order issued by a court
regarding a matter that was subsequently sealed may file or cite to that decision
in any subsequent proceeding. The party or court filing or citing to that
decision shall ensure that information regarding the identity of the defendant in
the sealed record is redacted.
(5) The Vermont Crime Information Center and Criminal Justice
Information Services Division of the Federal Bureau of Investigations shall
have access to sealed criminal history records without limitation for the
purpose of responding to queries to the National Instant Criminal Background
Check System regarding firearms transfers and attempted transfers.
(6) The State’s Attorney and Attorney General may disclose information
contained in a sealed criminal history record when required to meet their
otherwise legally required discovery obligations.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 84 of 86
(7) The person whose criminal history records have been sealed
pursuant to this chapter and the person’s attorney may access and use the
sealed records.
(8) A law enforcement agency may inspect and receive copies of the
sealed criminal history records of any applicant who applies to the agency to
be a law enforcement officer or a current employee for the purpose of internal
investigation.
(9) Persons or entities conducting research shall have access to a sealed
criminal history record to carry out research pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2056b.
(10) Upon adopting rules outlining a process for handling sealed records
and maintaining confidentiality and the standards for determining when
information contained in a sealed record may be used for the purpose of
licensing decisions, the Vermont Criminal Justice Council may inspect and
receive copies of sealed criminal history records. Access to such records shall
not be permitted if the Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules objects
to some or all of the rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 842(b) and files the objection
or objections in certified form pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 842(c). Sealed records
shall remain confidential and not be available for inspection and copying
unless and until the Council relies on such records in a public licensing
decision.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 85 of 86
(11) Upon adopting rules outlining a process for handling sealed records
and maintaining confidentiality and the standards for determining when
information contained in a sealed record may be used for the purpose of
licensing decisions, the Vermont Office of Professional Regulation may
inspect and receive copies of sealed criminal history records. Access to such
records shall not be permitted if the Legislative Committee on Administrative
Rules objects to some or all of the rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 842(b) and files
the objection or objections in certified form pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 842(c).
Sealed records shall remain confidential and not be available for inspection and
copying unless and until the Office relies on such records in a public licensing
decision.
(12) Upon adopting rules outlining a process for handling sealed records
and maintaining confidentiality and the standards for determining when
information contained in a sealed record may be used for the purpose of
licensing decisions, the Vermont Board of Medical Practice may inspect and
receive copies of sealed criminal history records. Access to such records shall
not be permitted if the Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules objects
to some or all of the rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 842(b) and files the objection
or objections in certified form pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 842(c). Sealed records
shall remain confidential and not be available for inspection and copying
unless and until the Board relies on such records in a public licensing decision.
VT LEG #380310 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.411
2025 Page 86 of 86
(e) If the court denies the motion to discharge the youth from probation, the
court may extend or amend the probation order as it deems necessary.
(f) Upon the termination of the period of probation, the youth shall be
discharged from probation.
* * * Public Inebriates * * *
Sec. 31. REPEAL
2019 Acts and Resolves No. 6, Secs. 99 and 100 (amendments to 18 V.S.A.
§§ 4810(d)–(j) and 4811 that prohibited public inebriates from being
incarcerated in a Department of Corrections’ facility) are repealed.
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 32. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Secs. 14–17 (relating to recidivism) and Sec. 31
(relating to public inebriates) shall take effect on passage.
(b) Secs. 21 and 22 (relating to raise the age) shall take effect on March 31,
2025.
(c) Secs. 1–3 (relating to extradition), Secs. 4–6 (related to reduced and
suspended sentences), Secs. 7–9 (related to bail), Secs. 18–20 (relating to the
big 14 juvenile offenses), and Secs. 23–30 (relating to youthful offenders) shall
take effect on July 1, 2025.
(d) Secs. 10–13 (relating to sealing criminal history records) shall take
effect on September 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380310 v.1